Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF873.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin RUSSELL TYLER RUTHTON INDEPENDENT SCHOOL DISTRICT; SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION FOR CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Exemption; refund. new text end new text begin (a) Materials and supplies used or consumed in and equipment incorporated into the construction of a prekindergarten through grade 12 school building and athletic field in Independent School District No. 2902, Russell Tyler Ruthton, are exempt from sales and use tax imposed under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 297A, if the materials, supplies, and equipment were purchased after December 31, 2019, and before January 1, 2024. new text end new text begin (b) The tax must be imposed and collected as if the rate under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.62, subdivisions 1 and 1a, applied and then refunded in the same manner provided for projects under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.75, subdivision 1, clause (17). Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 289A.40, claims for refunds for sales and purchases made after December 31, 2019, and before January 1, 2022, may be filed until January 1, 2026. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin The amount required to pay the refunds under subdivision 1 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively for sales and purchases made after December 31, 2019, and before January 1, 2024. new text end